Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF47.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.198, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Installation requirements. (a) The installation of underground telecommunications infrastructure that is located within ten feet of existing underground utilities or that crosses the existing underground utilities must be performed by safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers as follows: (1) the location of existing utilities by hand- or hydro-excavation or other accepted methods must be performed by a safety-qualified underground telecommunications installer;new text begin andnew text end (2) where telecommunications infrastructure is installed by means of directional drilling, the monitoring of the location and depth of the drill head must be performed by a safety-qualified underground telecommunications installerdeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (3) no fewer than two safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers must be present at all times at any location where telecommunications infrastructure is being installed by means of directional drilling. deleted text end deleted text begin (b) Beginning July 1, 2025, all installations of underground telecommunications infrastructure subject to this subdivision within the seven-county metropolitan area must be performed by safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers that meet the requirements of this subdivision. deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end Beginning January 1, 2026, all installations of underground telecommunications infrastructure subject to this subdivision within this state must be performed by safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers that meet the requirements of this subdivision. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.198, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Certification Standards. (a) The commissioner of labor and industry, in consultation with the Office of Broadband, shall approve standards for a safety-qualified underground telecommunications installer certification program that requires a person to: (1) complete a deleted text begin 40-hourdeleted text end new text begin ten-hournew text end initial course that includes classroom and hands-on instruction covering proper work procedures for safe installation of underground utilities, including: (i) regulations applicable to excavation near existing utilities; (ii) identification, location, and verification of utility lines using hand- or hydro-excavation or other accepted methods; (iii) response to line strike incidents; (iv) traffic control procedures; (v) use of a tracking device to safely guide directional drill equipment along a drill path; and (vi) avoidance and mitigation of safety hazards posed by underground utility installation projects; (2) demonstrate knowledge of the course material by successfully completing an examination approved by the commissioner; and (3) complete a four-hour refresher course within three years of completing the original course and every three years thereafter in order to maintain certification. (b) The commissioner must develop an approval process for training providers under this subdivision and may suspend or revoke the approval of any training provider that fails to demonstrate consistent delivery of approved curriculum or success in preparing participants to complete the examination. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end